Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.100

Examinations—Time of—Subjects—Manner.

Examinations for license to practice veterinary medicine, surgery and dentistry shall be held at least once each year at such times and places as the secretary may authorize and direct. The examination shall be on subjects that are ordinarily included in the curricula of veterinary colleges. All examinees shall be tested by written examination, supplemented by such oral interviews and practical demonstrations as the board deems necessary.

[ 1995 c 198 s 14; 1991 c 3 s 243; 1967 ex.s. c 50 s 6; 1959 c 92 s 7; 1941 c 71 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10040-7.]